Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.150

Injunctions—Voiding of licenses, permits, or certificates.

(1) Any activity conducted in violation of any provision of this chapter may be enjoined in an action commenced by the commission through the attorney general or by the prosecuting attorney or legal counsel of any city or town in which the prohibited activity may occur.

(2) When a violation of any provision of this chapter or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant hereto has occurred on any property or premises for which one or more licenses, permits, or certificates issued by this state, or any political subdivision or public agency thereof are in effect, all such licenses, permits and certificates may be voided and no license, permit, or certificate so voided shall be issued or reissued for such property or premises for a period of up to sixty days thereafter.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 218 s 15.]